Utah statutes.
53B-1-201.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Conditional gift" means a gift as defined in Subsection (4) that is
subject to conditions:
(a)  imposed, requested, or provided by a foreign government or foreign
person; and
(b)  that relate to:
(i)  what kinds of teachers or students may benefit from the gift; or
(ii)  a description of the subject matter to be taught with the support of the
gift.
(2)  "Foreign government" means a government other than the government of:
(a)  the United States;
(b)  a state within the United States;
(c)  a territory or possession of the United States; or
(d)  a political subdivision of the United States.
(3)  "Foreign person" means:
(a)  a foreign government defined in Subsection (2);
(b)  an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States or of
a territory or protectorate of the United States;
(c)  a corporation, partnership, joint venture, proprietorship, trust,
association, or other entity that is created or organized under the laws of a
foreign government or that has its principal place of business located outside
the United States;
(d)  if known by the higher education institution, a corporation, partnership,
joint venture, proprietorship, trust, association, or other entity that is
created or organized pursuant to the laws of the United States or a state
within the United States, if a majority of the stock or other equity interest
is directly or indirectly owned by, or which derives a majority of its funding
from:
(i)  a foreign government;
(ii)  an individual described in Subsection (3)(b); or
(iii)  an entity described in Subsection (3)(c) or (d); or
(e)  if known by the higher education institution, a committee or other group
in which a majority of the membership is composed of:
(i)  a foreign government;
(ii)  an individual described in Subsection (3)(b); or
(iii)  an entity described in Subsection (3)(c) or (d).
(4)  "Gift" means an endowment, scholarship, gift, donation, or grant of money
or property of any kind.
(5)  "Higher education institution" means an institution in the state system
of higher education as defined in Section 53B-1-102.
